zh-CN: 商业/工业 > 工业仓储: 工业用柜; 工业货架; 集装箱; 金属丝隔断、围栏和门
fi: Yritys ja teollisuus > Teollinen säilytys: Varastokaapit; Varastohyllyt; Kuljetuskontit; Ritiläseinät, -aidat ja -ovet
bg-BG: Бизнес и промишленост > Системи за индустриално съхранение: Индустриални шкафове; Индустриални рафтове; Транспортни контейнери; Телени прегради, заграждения и врати
fr: Entreprise et industrie > Stockage industriel: Armoires industrielles; Étagères industrielles; Conteneurs; Cloisons, clôtures et portes grillagées
el: Επιχειρηματικός & βιομηχανικός εξοπλισμός > Βιομηχανική αποθήκευση: Βιομηχανικά ντουλάπια; Βιομηχανικά ράφια; Εμπορευματοκιβώτια αποστολής; Συρμάτινα χωρίσματα, κουφώματα & πόρτες
ru: Бизнес и промышленность > Системы хранения на производственных складах: Производственные шкафы; Производственные стеллажи; Контейнеры для транспортировки; Перегородки, боксы и двери из проволочной сетки
hr-HR: Posao i industrija > Industrijsko skladištenje: Industrijski ormari; Industrijske police; Otpremni kontejneri; Žičane pregrade, kućišta i vrata
nb: Forretninger og industri > Industriell lagring: Industrielle skap; Industrielle hyller; Fraktcontainere; Tråddelere, beholdere og dører
vi: Kinh doanh & Công nghiệp > Cất giữ công nghiệp: Tủ công nghiệp; Kệ đựng công nghiệp; Thùng vận chuyển; Vùng khoanh dây, hàng rào và cửa
es: Economía e industria > Almacenamiento industrial: Armarios industriales; Estanterías industriales; Contenedores para transporte; Particiones, cierres y puertas de tela metálica
zh-TW: 商業與各產業 > 工業倉儲: 工業櫥櫃; 工業貨架; 貨櫃; 鐵線圍欄/籠/門
da: Erhverv og industri > Opbevaring til industri: Industriskabe; Industrireoler; Skibscontainere; Trådnetafskærmninger, -indhegninger og -døre
nl: Zakelijk en industrieel > Industriële opslag: Industriële kasten; Industriële stellingen; Zeecontainers; Metalen veiligheidshekken, -wanden en -deuren
ro-RO: Afaceri și sectorul industrial > Depozitare pentru sectorul industrial: Dulapuri industriale; Rafturi industriale; Containere pentru transport; Pereți despărțitori din sârmă, incinte și uși
sl-SI: Posel in industrija > Industrijsko skladiščenje: Industrijske omare; Industrijske police; Prevozni zabojniki; Kovinske pregrade, ohišja in vrata
it: Commercio e industria > Stoccaggio industriale: Armadi industriali; Scaffalature industriali; Container per spedizioni; Porte, divisori e recinti in rete metallica
tr: İş ve Endüstri > Endüstriyel Depolama: Endüstriyel Dolaplar; Endüstriyel Raflar; Nakliye Konteynırları; Tel Bölmeler, Dolaplar ve Kapılar
cs: Obchod a průmysl > Průmyslové skladování: Průmyslové skříňky; Průmyslové regály; Přepravní kontejnery; Drátěné přepážky, klece a dveře
hu: Üzlet és ipar > Ipari raktározás: Ipari szekrények; Ipari polcok; Szállítási konténerek; Vezetékes válaszfalak, burkolatok és ajtók
sk-SK: Obchod a priemysel > Priemyselné skladovanie: Priemyselné skrine; Priemyselné regály; Prepravné kontajnery; Drôtené priečky, kryty a dvierka
th: ธุรกิจและอุตสาหกรรม > การจัดเก็บเชิงอุตสาหกรรม: ตู้อุตสาหกรรม; ชั้นอุตสาหกรรม; คอนเทนเนอร์การขนส่ง; ตะแกรงเหล็กและประตู
pt-BR: Comercial e industrial > Armazenamento industrial: Armários industriais; Prateleiras industriais; Contêineres para transporte; Compartimentos e portas de tela
lt-LT: Verslas ir pramonė > Pramoninis sandėliavimas: Pramoninės spintos; Pramoninės lentynos; Transportavimo konteineriai; Vielinės pertvaros, korpusai ir durys
ja: ビジネス・産業 > 業務用ストレージ: 業務用キャビネット; 業務用棚・シェルフ; 出荷用コンテナ; メッシュフェンス
sv: Företag och industri > Industrilager: Lagerskåp; Lagerhyllor; Fraktcontainrar; Ståltrådspaneler, -inhägnader och -dörrar
ko: 비즈니스/산업 > 산업용 보관시설: 산업용 캐비닛; 산업용 선반; 배송 컨테이너; 와이어 파티션/울타리/도어
pt-PT: Business e industrial > Armazenamento industrial: Armários industriais; Prateleiras industriais; Contentores de expedição; Divisórias, recintos e portas metálicos
de: Wirtschaft & Industrie > Gewerbliche Lagerung: Industrieschränke; Industrieregale; Frachtcontainer; Zäune, Einfriedungen & Türen
pl: Biznes i przemysł > Magazynowanie: Szafy przemysłowe; Regały przemysłowe; Kontenery transportowe; Przegrody, klatki i drzwi z siatki
en: Business & Industrial > Industrial Storage: Industrial Cabinets; Industrial Shelving; Shipping Containers; Wire Partitions, Enclosures & Doors